Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4944.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER III Sec. 1a. Each individual arrested for an alleged criminal violation in this state must be afforded due process and must be advised of the individual's right to remain silent, be advised of the individual's right to have an attorney present during questioning, and be provided the warning that anything that the individual says may be used against the individual in court. CHAPTER IV Sec. 13. A peace officer who has arrested a person an individual for an offense without a warrant shall, without unnecessary delay not more than 48 hours after the arrest, take the person individual arrested before a magistrate of the judicial district in which the offense is charged to have been committed , and shall present a complaint to the magistrate a complaint stating that states the charge against the person individual arrested.